Hawaii statutes.
§226-21 Objective and policies for
socio-cultural advancement--education. (a) Planning for the State's
socio-cultural advancement with regard to education shall be directed towards
achievement of the objective of the provision of a variety of educational
opportunities to enable individuals to fulfill their needs, responsibilities,
and aspirations.

(b) To achieve the education objective, it
shall be the policy of this State to:

(1) Support educational programs and activities that
enhance personal development, physical fitness, recreation, and cultural
pursuits of all groups.

(2) Ensure the provision of adequate and accessible
educational services and facilities that are designed to meet individual and
community needs.

(3) Provide appropriate educational opportunities for
groups with special needs.

(4) Promote educational programs which enhance
understanding of Hawaii's cultural heritage.

(5) Provide higher educational opportunities that
enable Hawaii's people to adapt to changing employment demands.

(6) Assist individuals, especially those experiencing
critical employment problems or barriers, or undergoing employment transitions,
by providing appropriate employment training programs and other related
educational opportunities.

(7) Promote programs and activities that facilitate
the acquisition of basic skills, such as reading, writing, computing,
listening, speaking, and reasoning.

(8) Emphasize quality educational programs in
Hawaii's institutions to promote academic excellence.

(9) Support research programs and activities that
enhance the education programs of the State. [L 1978, c 100, pt of §2; am L
1986, c 276, §20]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next